Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB67.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 301(a) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 301. Organization of commission.(a) Composition.--[The] Subject to subsection (b.1), the independent administrative commission known as the Pennsylvania Game Commission shall consist of nine competent citizens of this Commonwealth who shall be well informed on the subject of wildlife conservation and restoration and who shall be appointed by the Governor, by and with the advice and consent of a 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 majority of the elected members of the Senate.* * *(b.1) Additional consideration.--The Governor shall ensure that at least one member of the commission represents the interest of agricultural commodities that pertain to normal agricultural operations and wildlife.* * *(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agricultural commodity." As defined in section 2 of the act of June 10, 1982 (P.L.454, No.133), referred to as the Right-to-Farm Law."Normal agricultural operation." As defined in section 2 of the Right-to-Farm Law.Section 2. Sections 2102(b)(2), 2122 and 2125 of Title 34 are amended to read:§ 2102. Regulations.* * *(b) Seasons, possession, bag limits and devices.--* * *(2) If in any year the commission fails to establish seasons or bag limits or fails to establish other hunting or furtaking regulations under authority of this title, the open seasons and bag limits for game or furbearers[, Sundays excepted], unless otherwise provided by this title, and all other hunting or furtaking regulations adopted under authority of this title, shall be the same as set by regulation of the commission for the previous license year, and all seasons shall open and close one calendar day earlier 20250SB0067PN0982 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 than the previous license year. In the event the commission fails to establish seasons and bag limits for a license year beginning in a leap year, the seasons shall open and close two calendar days earlier than the previous license year.* * *§ 2122. Report to commission officer.Any person who kills any game or wildlife, other than raccoons, under the provisions of this subchapter shall, within 24 hours, report, orally or in writing, the killing to an officer of the commission. The report shall set forth the date, time and place of the killing, the number of species killed [and], the sex of the species[.] and the location of each carcass. The commission shall establish a self-reporting system that allows a person assigned to remove deer for crop damage purposes to report each harvest to an officer of the commission via a toll-free telephone number, online application or publicly accessible Internet website.§ 2125. Surrender of carcass [to commission officer].Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, the entire carcass, including the head and hide[,] of all big game animals and the entire carcass of any other game or wildlife, other than raccoons, less entrails, shall be made available, unless otherwise directed by an officer of the commission, intact[, less entrails,] to any commission officer calling for them[.] or delivered to a processor for final disposition. As used in this section, the term "processor" means a location specified by the commission that is willing to accept donations of animals taken under this chapter.Section 3. Section 2126(a) heading of Title 34 is amended and subsections (a) and (b) are amended by adding paragraphs to 20250SB0067PN0982 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 read:§ 2126. Unlawful activities.(a) [General rule] Violations.--It is unlawful for any person while acting under the provisions of this subchapter to:* * *(8.1) Fail to obtain written permission to hunt on a Sunday.* * *(b) Penalties.--* * *(4) A violation of this subchapter pertaining to written permission is a summary offense of the third degree.Section 4. Section 2303 of Title 34 is repealed:[§ 2303. Hunting on Sunday prohibited.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in this title, it is unlawful for any person to hunt for any furbearer or game on Sunday.(b) Construction of section.--This section shall not be construed to prohibit:(1) The training of dogs.(2) The participation in dog trials as provided for in this title.(3) The removal of lawfully taken game or wildlife from traps or the resetting of the traps on Sunday.(b.1) Exceptions.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to:(1) The hunting of foxes.(2) The hunting of coyotes.(3) Any hunting which occurs on noncommercial regulated hunting grounds holding a valid permit under section 2928(b)(2) (relating to regulated hunting grounds permits).20250SB0067PN0982 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Hunting on three Sundays each calendar year, as follows:(i) One day of Sunday hunting shall be instituted by the commission during the deer rifle season.(ii) One day of Sunday hunting shall be instituted by the commission during the Statewide deer archery season.(iii) One day of Sunday hunting as determined by the commission shall be instituted by the commission.Authority to hunt on any Sunday instituted by the commission under this paragraph shall not apply to any person required to secure a hunting license who attempts to hunt on private land without obtaining written permission of the landowner, an agent of the landowner or lessee.(c) Penalty.--A violation of this section is a summary offense of the fifth degree.]Section 5. Section 2308(b) of Title 34 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 2308. Unlawful devices and methods.* * *(b) Exceptions.--The provisions of subsection (a) shall not apply to:* * *(7) Natural deer urine for the purposes of taking, attempting to take, attracting or scouting wildlife. that meets all of the following criteria:(i) Has no detectable levels of chronic wasting disease prions.(ii) Is labeled as being tested using real-time quaking-induced conversion assay or another commercially 20250SB0067PN0982 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 available testing method that detects the presence of chronic wasting disease prions . For the purposes of this subparagraph, the Department of Agriculture may randomly select natural deer urine products for testing on a biannual basis. The Department of Agriculture shall pay for the costs incurred for testing under this subparagraph.* * *Section 6. Section 2314(a) and (c) of Title 34 are amended to read:§ 2314. Trespass on private property while hunting.(a) [General rule] Trespass.--A person, while engaged in hunting or furtaking, commits an offense if, knowing that the person is not licensed or privileged to do so, the person:(1) enters or remains on any land of another without authorization to do so, when the land is posted in a manner prescribed by law or reasonably likely to come to the person's attention [or is fenced or enclosed in a manner manifestly designed to exclude trespassers; or];(2) enters or remains on any land of another without authorization and defies an order not to enter or to leave that has been personally communicated to the person by the owner of the land or other authorized person[.];(3) enters or remains on any land of another without authorization to do so, when the land is fenced or enclosed in a manner manifestly designed to exclude trespassers; or(4) subject to subsection (b), enters or remains on any land of another without authorization to do so when notice against trespass is given by the placement of identifying purple paint marks on trees or posts on the property, in 20250SB0067PN0982 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordance with 18 Pa.C.S. § 3503(b)(1)(vi) (relating to criminal trespass).* * *(c) Penalty.--An offense under this section shall be graded as follows:(1) A person who violates subsection (a)(1), (3) or (4) commits a summary offense of the [third degree.] second degree and may result in forfeiture of the privilege to hunt or take game or wildlife anywhere within this Commonwealth for a period of up to one year . (2) A person who violates subsection (a)(2) commits a misdemeanor[.] and shall result in forfeiture of the privilege to hunt or take game or wildlife anywhere within this Commonwealth for a period of three years . (3) A person who commits a second or subsequent violation of this section within a seven-year period commits a misdemeanor, and the second or subsequent violation shall result in forfeiture of the privilege to hunt or take game or wildlife anywhere within this Commonwealth for a period of [one year] five years.* * *Section 7. Section 2315 of Title 34 is repealed:[§ 2315. Hunting on Sunday without written permission.(a) General rule.--A person required to secure a hunting license to hunt commits an offense if, while engaged in hunting on Sunday under section 2303(b.1)(4) (relating to hunting on Sunday prohibited), the person enters private land without obtaining written permission of the landowner, an agent of the landowner or lessee.(b) Penalty.--A person who violates subsection (a) commits a 20250SB0067PN0982 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 summary offense of the third degree.]Section 8. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0067PN0982 - 8 - 12